South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5096.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 17, Title 47 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Article 5 Cell-Cultured MeatArtificial or Cell-Cultured Food Product Section 47-17-510. (A) For the purposes of this section: (1) "artificial or cell-cultivated food product" means any food product developed in a laboratory or facility and grown from a biopsy of living animal cells including, but not limited to, livestock, poultry, fish, crustaceans, or other animal protein; and (2) "sells, or holds or offers for sale" does not include retail sales except under the circumstances where a retailer is also the manufacturer. (B) It shall be unlawful for any person to: (1) manufacture, sell, hold, offer for sale, or distribute artificial or cell-cultivated food product in this State; or (2) label any artificial or cell-cultivated food product as beef, poultry, fish, crustacean, or any other animal protein that the artificial or cell-cultivated food product may resemble for the purposes of advertising, manufacturing, selling, or holding or offering for sale in this State. (C) No person who advertises, manufactures, sells, or holds or offers for sale any artificial or cell-cultivated food product in this State shall engage in a misleading or deceptive practice related to an artificial or cell-cultivated food product including, but not limited to, misrepresenting an artificial or cell-cultivated food product as being derived from harvested production beef, poultry, fish, crustacean, or other animal protein. The front of all artificial or cell-cultivated food product packaging must contain a conspicuous label that indicates that the artificial or cell-cultivated food product is not beef, poultry, fish, crustacean, or any other animal protein that the artificial or cell-cultivated food product may resemble. (D)(C) Each package that violates a provision of this section shall be a separate and distinct offense. Section 47-17-520. The provisions of this article do not apply to plant-based meat substitutes.Reserved. Section 47-17-530. (A) A person who violates this article is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be imprisoned not more than one year, or fined not more than one thousand dollars, or both. (B) The department may revoke or suspend the business license of a food establishment that manufactures, distributes, or sells cultivated meat in violation of this article. (C) In addition to the penalties provided in this section, the business license of any restaurant, store, or other business may be suspended upon the conviction of an owner or employee of that business for a violation of this article in connection with that business. (D) The department may issue and enforce a stop-sale, stop-use, removal, or hold order on a product found to be in violation of this article. (E) The department may promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this article. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----